Utah statutes.
16-6a-1409.   Service on dissolved nonprofit corporation.
(1)  A dissolved nonprofit corporation shall:
(a)  maintain a registered agent to accept service of process on its behalf;
or
(b)  be considered to have authorized service of process on it by registered
or certified mail, return receipt requested, to:
(i)  the address of its principal office, if any:
(A)  as set forth in its articles of dissolution; or
(B)  as last changed by notice delivered to the division for filing; or
(ii)  the address for service of process that:
(A)  is stated in its articles of dissolution; or
(B)  as last changed by notice delivered to the division for filing.
(2)  Service effected pursuant to Subsection (1)(b) is perfected at the
earliest of:
(a)  the date the dissolved nonprofit corporation receives the process,
notice, or demand;
(b)  the date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the
dissolved nonprofit corporation; or
(c)  five days after mailing.
(3)  Subsection (1) does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the
required means, of serving a dissolved nonprofit corporation.
